Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-513
Refilling of package or container; credit for unused liquid.

When liquefied petroleum gas is sold by the package or container, either by a refilling of a container or an exchange of containers, the vendor shall give the purchaser full credit for the unused liquid remaining in a container being exchanged or refilled.

Laws 1957, c. 240, § 6, p. 802.